dev/noun/noun.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নেওয়া__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পুরস্কার__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="তামাক__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোয়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টায়</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="নেওয়া"><i>নেওয়া</i><par n="নেওয়া__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরস্কার"><i>পুরস্কার</i><par n="পুরস্কার__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="তামাক"><i>তামাক</i><par n="তামাক__n_nt"/></e>
